Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,101
Program; requirements.

(1) The program shall (a) comply with all applicable provisions of state and federal law relating to the storage, distribution, and dispensing of donated prescription drugs and (b) not resell donated prescription drugs and supplies.

(2) Nothing in the Prescription Drug Donation Program Act shall be construed to restrict the use of samples by a prescribing practitioner during the course of such practitioner's duties at a health care facility or pharmacy.

Laws 2024, LB1035, § 6.